West Virginia, session 2026, HB4903.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. SALARY INCREASE FOR STATE EMPLOYEES. §5-5-4b. Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services, and Regional Jail Authority pay equity salary adjustment. (a) The Legislature hereby finds that the Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services and the West Virginia Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority have extreme difficulty with recruiting and retaining employees of all types. (b) The Legislature hereby directs that a pay equity salary adjustment and increase be provided to all employees of the Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services, and the West Virginia Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority, regardless of where the employee reports to work. This salary adjustment shall be for a total of $6,000 apportioned over a three-year period as follows: (1) On July 1, 2018, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services, and the West Virginia Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000;(2) On July 1, 2019, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services, and the West Virginia Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000; and (3) On July 1, 2020, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections, Division of Juvenile Services, and the West Virginia Regional Jail and Correctional Facility Authority shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000.(c) Funding for the pay rates for employees of the Division of Corrections and Division of Juvenile Services shall be provided from the general revenue appropriations to the Division of Corrections and Division of Juvenile Services, respectively. (d) The salary adjustment for employees of the West Virginia Regional Jail Authority shall be funded from the special revenue fund established in §31-20-10 of this code, and shall not require additional general revenue appropriations from the Legislature.(e)(1) The Legislature hereby directs that a pay equity salary adjustment and increase be provided to full-time equivalent employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation that are employed as non-uniform administrative staff. This salary adjustment shall be for a total of $6,000 apportioned over a three-year period as follows:(2) On July 1, 2026, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000;(3) On July 1, 2027, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000; and (4) On July 1, 2028, applicable employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall be given an increase in annual pay of $2,000.(f) For purposes of the reenactment of this section during the regular session of the Legislature in 2026, the salary adjustments set forth in subsection (e) of this section for the applicable full-time equivalent employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation that are employed as non-uniform administrative staff shall be paid from the general revenue appropriations to the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation:  Provided, That the salary adjustment for the applicable full-time equivalent employees of the Division of Corrections and Rehabilitation that are employed as non-uniform administrative staff employed at a regional jail shall be funded from the special revenue fund established in §15A-3-16 of this code.(e)(g) In the event If any provision of this section conflicts with any rule, policy, or provision of this code, this section shall control. Due to the limits of funding, the implementation of the pay rates and employment requirements shall may not be subject to the provisions of §6C-2-1 et seq. of this code. The provisions of this section are rehabilitative in nature and it is the specific intent of the Legislature that no private cause of action, either express or implied, shall arise pursuant to the provisions or implementation of this section.(f)(h) If, following this pay raise, the employee will make more than the maximum allowable by the Division of Personnel for the pay grade, this salary increase shall still take effect, and that employee shall make more than the pay grade maximum.